Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.872

Periodic posttenure evaluation.

By June 30, 1994, each community and technical college shall establish, through the local collective bargaining process, periodic posttenure evaluation of all full-time faculty consistent with the standards of the Northwest association of schools and colleges.

[ 1993 c 188 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—Severability—1993 c 188: See notes following RCW 28B.50.851.